Illinois, session 104th, HB4540.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Companion 5Animal Custody Equity Act.  6    Section 5. Findings; purpose. The General Assembly finds 7that: 8        (1) Companion animals often occupy a unique role 9    within households that is not fully reflected in existing 10    statutory frameworks governing possession disputes. 11        (2) Current Illinois law permits courts to consider 12    the well-being of a companion animal primarily within 13    dissolution of marriage proceedings. 14        (3) In disputes involving unmarried parties, courts 15    may lack explicit statutory guidance to evaluate 16    caregiving history or animal welfare. 17        (4) Providing courts with limited discretion to 18    consider such factors promotes consistency, clarity, and 19    fairness in judicial decision-making. 20        (5) The purpose of this Act is to provide courts with 21    guidance when resolving possession disputes involving 22    companion animals while preserving existing property law 23    principles.   HB4540 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17489 JRC 30915 b1    Section 10. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 2changing Section 19-101 and by adding Sections 19-106.5 and 319-130 as follows: 4    (735 ILCS 5/19-101)  (from Ch. 110, par. 19-101)5    Sec. 19-101. When brought. 6    (a) Whenever any goods or chattels have been wrongfully 7distrained, or otherwise wrongfully taken or are wrongfully 8detained, an action of replevin may be brought for the 9recovery of such goods or chattels, by the owner or person 10entitled to their possession.11    (b) When the property at issue is a companion animal, 12"companion animal" means an animal that is commonly considered 13to be, or is considered by the owner to be, a pet. "Companion 14animal" includes, but is not limited to, canines, felines, and 15equines.16    (c) "Parties" in an action in replevin concerning 17companion animals includes domestic partners, former partners, 18cohabitants, fiances, or roommates if shared responsibility 19for the care of the companion animal can be demonstrated. 20(Source: P.A. 82-280.) 21    (735 ILCS 5/19-106.5 new)22    Sec. 19-106.5. Temporary possession. When a companion 23animal is the subject of an action of replevin, at the   HB4540 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17489 JRC 30915 b1initiation and pendency of a dispute, a court, exercising 2discretion set forth in Section 19-130, may issue temporary 3possession or caregiving orders, including limited visitation, 4if necessary to reduce stress or disruption to the companion 5animal. Section 19-106 applies in matters concerning companion 6animals if the court finds as a matter of record and supported 7by evidence that summary seizure of the property is justified 8by reason of necessity as set forth in paragraphs (1) through 9(5) of Section 19-106. 10    (735 ILCS 5/19-130 new)11    Sec. 19-130. Companion animals. 12    (a) Judicial determinations. In a possession dispute 13involving a companion animal, a court may consider the 14well-being of the companion animal regardless of the legal 15status of the parties. In exercising discretion, the court may 16evaluate relevant evidence, including, but not limited to, the 17following:18        (1) History of daily caregiving responsibilities.19        (2) Feeding, grooming, veterinary, and training 20    involvement.21        (3) Financial contributions related to the animal's 22    care.23        (4) Emotional bonds between the animal and each party.24        (5) Stability and continuity of the animal's living 25    environment.  HB4540 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17489 JRC 30915 b1        (6) Safety considerations and past conduct affecting 2    the animal.3        (7) Credible witness testimony.4        (8) Age and physical or behavioral vulnerability of 5    the animal.6        (9) Continuity of routine and care.7        (10) Ownership documentation, but this may not be 8    determinative on its own.9        (11) For companion animals 10 years of age or older, 10    courts may give additional consideration to factors, 11    including continuity of environment, emotional stability, 12    stress minimization, and maintenance of established 13    routines.14    (b) Mediation. A court may, if appropriate, order 15mediation between the parties to resolve issues related to 16companion animal possession.